Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-502.01
Motor vehicle equipped with cargo tank; restrictions.

Any motor vehicle that is equipped with a cargo tank for the purpose of transporting motor vehicle fuel or diesel fuel shall be equipped with a suitable fuel supply tank and shall not have a fuel connection of any nature running from the cargo tank to the fuel supply tank or to the carburetor of such motor vehicle with which to draw fuel from the cargo tank.

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 83.